Hawaii statutes.
§381-11 Penalties. Any public utility
calling or causing a lockout in violation of section 381-9, or otherwise
contrary to this chapter, or without giving the notice required by sections
381-3 and 381-8, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or, in the case of an
individual, fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned not more than six months.

Any employee calling a strike or going out on
strike in violation of section 381-9, or otherwise contrary to this chapter, or
without giving the notice required by sections 381-3 and 381-8, shall be fined
not more than $100 or imprisoned not more than six months.

Any person instigating, inducing, or
encouraging any strike or lockout in violation of section 381-9, or otherwise
contrary to this chapter, shall be fined not more than $100 or imprisoned not
more than six months.

The penalties provided by this section shall
apply to any individual, person, corporation, or association, whether acting as
principal, agent, officer, director, for oneself, or itself, or for another
person. [L 1949, c 146, pt of §1; RL 1955, §91-12; HRS §381-11; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next